ch.twol
Alphabet
    а б в г д и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю I я
	%{obl%}:а %{obl%}:и %{obl%}:0
;

Sets
		vowels = а е и у о ы;
		liquids = л й р;
		consonants = б в г д к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь I й;

Rules

"drop morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"vowel epenthesis before case markers after consonants"
%{obl%}:а <=> consonants-liquids _ consonants-й;

"no vowel epenthesis before case markers after vowels"
%{obl%}:0 <=> vowels _ ;

"no vowel epenthesis before case markers after й, л, р"
%{obl%}:0 <=> liquids _ consonants-й;

"vowel epenthesis before plural forms with й"
%{obl%}:и <=> consonants-й _ й:й;
